Washington statutes.
RCW 35.55.180

Reassessments.

If any assessment is found to be invalid for any cause or if it is set aside for any reason in judicial proceeding, a reassessment may be made and all laws relative to the reassessment of local assessments, for street or other improvements, shall, as far as practicable, be applicable hereto.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.55.180. Prior: 1909 c 147 s 16; RRS s 9447.]